Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1508
Community college area officers and employees; bond.

The officers and employees of a community college area authorized to handle funds shall furnish and maintain a corporate surety bond in an amount, in a form, and with sureties approved by the board. A copy of such bond shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The premium on such bond shall be paid by the community college.

Laws 1975, LB 344, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2643;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 30.

Chapter 79, article 26, the Technical Community College Area Act, is not in violation of Article VIII, section 1A, of the Constitution. State ex rel. Western Technical Com. Col. Area v. Tallon, 196 Neb. 603, 244 N.W.2d 183 (1976).